Hawaii statutes.
[§103F-102] Definitions. As
used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Administrator" means the
administrator of the state procurement office.

"Agency" means any department,
authority, commission, council, board, committee, institution, legislative
body, agency, or other establishment or office of the executive, legislative,
or judicial branch of the State, and includes the office of Hawaiian affairs.

"Chief procurement officer" means
those officials designated by section 103D-203.

"Contract" means all types of
agreements, regardless of what they may be called.

"Contract amendment" means any
written alteration of scope of services, time of delivery, payment terms,
amount of payment, or other provisions of any contract accomplished by mutual
action of the parties to the contract.

"Data" means recorded information,
regardless of form or characteristic.

"Health and human services" means
services to communities, families, or individuals which are intended to
maintain or improve health or social well-being.

"Provider" means an organization or
individual contracted by a state agency to provide health or human services to
the public on its behalf.

"Purchasing agency" means a state
agency authorized to or responsible for entering into contracts to provide
health or human services to the public.

"Request for proposals" means all
documents, whether attached or incorporated by reference, soliciting providers
to submit a detailed plan to provide health or human services to the public, on
behalf of a state agency.

"Scope of service" means any
description of the type of activity, including but not limited to, number
served, outcomes being sought, target group, and geographic area in which the
activity takes place.

"Treatment" means services to
individuals and families by health or social work professionals which attempt
to alleviate physical or mental illness or behavioral problems, including but
not limited to, medical treatment, counseling, physical, occupational and other
therapeutic services, and referral and case management services for medical
treatment, counseling, and other therapeutic services. [L 1997, c 190, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next